Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.071

Formation—Certificate of formation.

(1) In order to form a limited liability company, one or more persons must execute a certificate of formation. The certificate of formation must be delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing in accordance with Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW and set forth:

(a) The name of the limited liability company;

(b) The name and address of the registered agent for service of process required to be maintained by RCW 25.15.021 and Article 4 of chapter 23.95 RCW;

(c) The address of the principal office of the limited liability company;

(d) If the limited liability company is to have a specific date of dissolution, the latest date on which the limited liability company is to dissolve;

(e) Any other matters the members decide to include; and

(f) The name and address of each person executing the certificate of formation.

(2)(a) Unless a delayed effective date is specified in accordance with RCW 23.95.210, a limited liability company is formed when its certificate of formation is filed by the secretary of state.

(b) The secretary of state's filing of the certificate of formation is conclusive proof that the persons executing the certificate satisfied all conditions precedent to the formation.

(3) A limited liability company formed under this chapter is a separate legal entity and has a perpetual existence.

(4) Any person may apply to the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.235 to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic limited liability company or a certificate of registration for a foreign limited liability company.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7106; 2015 c 188 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.